Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4130.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 42-17105, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-17105. Adoption of budget; amendments to city and town budgets A. After the hearing on estimates under section 42-17104 is concluded, the governing body shall convene in a special meeting and finally determine and adopt estimates of proposed expenditures for the purposes stated in the published proposal. B. The adopted estimates constitute the budget of the county, city or town for the current fiscal year. C. The total amounts that are proposed to be spent in the budget shall not exceed the total of amounts that were proposed for expenditure in the published estimates. D. A city or town may amend the city's or town's adopted budget during the fiscal year to spend additional revenues that were not included in the adopted budget by following the budget requirements prescribed in this article, subject to the following: 1. Notwithstanding section 42-17101, budget amendments do not have to be adopted on or before the third Monday in July each year. 2. A new or increased tax or fee shall not be adopted in the budget amendment. 3. The amended estimates adopted by a budget amendment constitute the amended budget of the city or town for the current fiscal year. 4. The total amounts that are proposed to be spent in the amended budget of the city or town shall not exceed the total of amounts that were proposed for expenditure in the published amended estimates. 5. the proposed budget amendment shall be placed on one regular meeting agenda for consideration and discussion before a vote at the next regular meeting and may not be a consent agenda item. END_STATUTE